Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.567

Reports—Financial and statistical data—As required by director.

A credit union shall file with the director any financial and statistical report that it is required to file with the national credit union administration. Each report must be certified by the principal operating officer of the credit union. In addition, a credit union shall file reports as may be required by the director.

[ 2001 c 83 s 29; 1997 c 397 s 49.]